Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
1199 SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
2200 codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
2211 This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Procurement
2222 Protection Act of 2026".
2233
2244
HB4193 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

11 SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
22 in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.59 of Title 74, unless there
33 is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
44 As used in this act:
55 1. "Company" means any sole proprietorship, organization,
66 association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited
77 partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability
88 company, or other entity or business association, including all
99 wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, parent
1100 companies, or affiliates of such entities or business associations
1111 that exist for the purpose of making profit;
1122 2. "Control" means:
1133 a. control as defined in the Investment Company Act of
1144 1940, 15 U.S.C., Section 80a-2(a), or
1155 b in the case of a company domiciled in the People’s
1166 Republic of China, involvement in a company’s
1177 governance structure, monitoring, or internal human
1188 resources decisions of a company consistent with the
1199 objectives set out in the Opinion on Strengthening the
2200 United Front Work of the Private Economy in the New
2211 Era issued by the General Office of the Central
2222 Committee of the Chinese Communist Party (2020) or a
2233 successor or similar document;
2244
HB4193 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

11 3. "Domicile" means the country in which a company is
22 registered, the company’s affairs are primarily completed, and where
33 the majority of ownership share is held;
44 4. "Federally banned corporation" means any company producing
55 designated equipment federally banned currently or banned after the
66 effective date of this act. Such bans shall include those resulting
77 from, but not limited to, the following federal agencies and acts:
88 a. the Federal Communications Commission, including, but
99 not limited to, any equipment or service deemed to
1100 pose a threat to national security identified on the
1111 Covered List developed pursuant to 47 C.F.R., Section
1122 1.50002 and published by the Public Safety and
1133 Homeland Security Bureau of the Federal Communications
1144 Commission pursuant to the federal Secure and Trusted
1155 Communications Networks Act of 2019, 47 U.S.C.,
1166 Section 1601 et seq.,
1177 b. the United States Department of Commerce,
1188 c. the Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency,
1199 d. the Federal Acquisition Security Council, and
2200 e. Section 889 of the John S. McCain National Defense
2211 Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2019, P. L. 115-232;
2222 5. "Foreign adversary" means adversarial nations including the
2233 People's Republic of China, the Russian Federation, the Islamic
2244 Republic of Iran, the Democratic People's Republic of Korea, the
HB4193 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

11 Repu blic of Cuba, the Venezuelan regime of Nicolás Maduro, and the
22 Syrian Arab Republic; and
33 6. "Foreign adversary company" means any company, other than a
44 United States person or United States subsidiary as such terms are
55 defined in 15 C.F.R., Section 772.1, that:
66 a. is domiciled, incorporated, issued, or listed in a
77 foreign adversary country,
88 b. is headquartered in a foreign adversary country,
99 c. has its principal place of business in a foreign
1100 adversary country,
1111 d. is controlled by the government of a foreign adversary
1122 or any instrumentality thereof, or
1133 e. is majority-owned by an entity controlled by the
1144 government of a foreign adversary or any
1155 instrumentality thereof.
1166 If a parent company does not meet any of the criteria set forth
1177 in this paragraph and does not recognize more than fifty percent
1188 (50%) of the total annual global revenue of the parent company and
1199 subsidiaries from a foreign adversary, such parent company shall not
2200 be considered a foreign adversary company.
2211 SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
2222 in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.59a of Title 74, unless there
2233 is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
2244
HB4193 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

11 A. Except as provided under subsection D of this section, the
22 following companies shall be ineligible to bid on or submit a
33 proposal for a contract with a state agency for goods or services:
44 1. A state-owned enterprise of a foreign adversary;
55 2. A company domiciled within a foreign adversary;
66 3. A foreign adversary company; or
77 4. A federally banned corporation.
88 B. A state agency shall require a company that submits a bid or
99 proposal with respect to a contract for goods or services to certify
1100 that the company is not a company listed under subsection A of this
1111 section.
1122 C. If the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
1133 Services determines that a company has knowingly submitted a false
1144 certification under subsection B of this section:
1155 1. The company shall be liable for a civil penalty in an amount
1166 that is equal to Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) or
1177 twice the amount of the contract for which a bid or proposal was
1188 submitted, whichever is greater;
1199 2. The state agency or the Office of Management and Enterprise
2200 Services shall terminate the contract with the company; and
2211 3. The company shall be ineligible to, and shall not, bid on a
2222 state contract for sixty (60) months and shall provide proof of
2233 ownership change to the State Purchasing Director before being
2244 eligible again to bid on state contracts.
HB4193 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

11 D. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B of this
22 section, a state agency may enter into a contract for goods
33 manufactured by a company listed under subsection A of this section
44 if:
55 1. There is no other reasonable option for procuring the good;
66 and
77 2. The contract is pre-approved by the Director of the Office
88 of Management and Enterprise Services after a determination that not
99 procuring the good would pose a greater threat to this state than
1100 the threat associated with the procurement.
1111 E. This act does not apply to a company, including a third
1122 party vendor, that is in compliance with the Secure and Trusted
1133 Communications Networks Act of 2019, P.L. 116-124.
1144 SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
1155
1166 COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
03/03/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.
1177
1188
1199
2200
2211
2222
2233
2244
HB4193 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.